Arkansas, session 2025, HB1325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-901, concerning reciprocal service
recognized under the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System, is amended
to add a new subsection to read as follows:
(f)(1) A member of the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System
previously covered under an alternate retirement plan as defined in § 24-7-
202 may be credited for each year of employment covered under the alternate
retirement plan to meet eligibility requirements for receiving a monthly
retirement benefit under the system if the employee did not:
(A) Vest in the alternate retirement plan; and
*LJH045*
01/30/2025 10:09:40 AM LJH045

HB1325
(B) Receive a payment or withdraw contributions from the
alternate retirement plan for the period of covered employment.
(2) The Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall not
credit service for retirement eligibility under this subsection until:
(A) The member provides documentation to the Arkansas
Public Employees' Retirement System from the covered employer and the
alternate retirement plan that verifies the conditions in subdivision (f)(1)
of this section; and
(B) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Public
Employees' Retirement System determines that there is sufficient
documentation and that all other requirements are met to credit service from
the alternate retirement plan.
























01/30/2025 10:09:40 AM LJH045